Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5939XC (2) 91 as/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 708.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 708.6 Intimidation with a dangerous weapon. 3 1. A person commits a class âCâ felony when the person, 4 with the intent to injure or provoke fear or anger in another , 5 shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon at, 6 into, or in a building, vehicle, airplane, railroad engine, 7 railroad car, or boat, occupied by another person, or within an 8 assembly of people, and thereby places the occupants or people 9 in reasonable apprehension of serious injury or threatens to 10 commit such an act under circumstances raising a reasonable 11 expectation that the threat will be carried out. 12 2. A person commits a class âDâ felony when the person 13 shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon 14 at another person or at , into, or in a building, vehicle, 15 airplane, railroad engine, railroad car, or boat, occupied by 16 another person, or within an assembly of people, and thereby 17 places the occupants or people in reasonable apprehension 18 of serious injury or threatens to commit such an act under 19 circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat 20 will be carried out. 21